California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65053.

The council shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65054.

(a) The secretary may require the council to correct or cease any existing activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the council refuses or fails to cease those activities or functions or to make the corrections as required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the council until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the secretary has been accomplished by the council.

(c) Actions of the council in violation of the written notice are without legal force or effect.
 The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice before the council entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions that are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the secretary shall notify the council in writing of the specific acts that the secretary determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, the secretary’s reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and recommendations that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65055.

The council may recommend to the secretary the adoption of administrative regulations that relate to the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65056.

(a) The council and the secretary shall keep confidential and shall not disclose, except when required by court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding, all lists in their possession of persons subject to this chapter. However, the council shall establish procedures consistent with this confidentiality requirement to enable producers to communicate with other producers on the lists regarding noncommercial matters affecting the council and persons subject to this chapter.

(b) Information on volume shipments, other information that is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports to the council, aggregate sales and inventory information, and any other information that does not include individual identifying producer or
 handler information may be disclosed by the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65057.

The council may investigate all matters that affect the administration of this chapter and report violations to the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65058.

(a) (1) A program or activity that is conducted or sponsored pursuant to this chapter shall not make false or unwarranted claims, or disparage the quality, value, use, or sale of any commodity authorized by law to be marketed in this state.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be construed to prohibit disclosure of any information to an investigative agency or a member of the public to protect the health or safety of the public.

(b) A program or activity shall not be conducted pursuant to this chapter with reference to a private brand or trade name that refers to beef or other products derived from the California cattle industry, except as provided for in
 subdivision (c).

(c) The council shall not expend funds for the advertising of brand name beef or other products derived from the California cattle industry unless the expenditures are approved by a two-thirds vote of the council with the concurrence of the secretary. The council may expend funds to conduct cost-sharing advertising with nonbeef brand name products.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Suspension of Operations [65060. - 65069.]

65060.

(a) On or before June 1, 2019, the Bureau of Livestock Identification shall submit to the secretary for review a list of producers who have sold or owned cattle in the last calendar year.

(b) The secretary may require auction markets and packers to submit the names and mailing addresses of all producers from whom they acquired cattle in the most recently completed fiscal year. The request for information shall be in writing and shall be filed within 10 days following receipt of the request.

(c) The secretary shall determine which producers are eligible to vote consistent with the definition of producer in subdivision (k) of Section 65012.

(d) Any producer who believes himself or herself to be eligible to vote whose name does not appear on the appropriate list may have his or her name placed on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying the producer as a person eligible to vote. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the person from paying fees and does not invalidate any votes conducted pursuant to this chapter.

(e) Any producer eligible to vote may contact those on the list regarding the referendum in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary if all expenses associated with those contacts are paid in advance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65061.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the secretary finds that a majority of producers participating in an initial referendum vote conducted by the secretary on or before June 1, 2020, or a second referendum vote conducted by the secretary pursuant to Section 65066, approve the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65062.

An implementation referendum shall advertise the amount to be assessed and declare that the assessment shall be a mandatory fee. An implementation referendum shall also advertise that the council will accept petitions to refund the fee for any producer subject to this chapter pursuant to Section 65075.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65063.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct a referendum, that shall not be more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65064.

Nonreceipt of a ballot by an eligible producer shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65065.

If the secretary finds that a majority vote has been given, the secretary shall certify and give notice of the majority vote to all producers whose names and addresses are on file with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65066.

If the secretary finds that a majority vote has not been given for an initial referendum, the secretary shall certify and declare all provisions of this chapter inoperative, except as necessary to conduct a second implementation referendum vote pursuant to this section. The secretary shall conduct a second implementation referendum vote two years or later following certification of the first vote. If the second referendum vote conducted pursuant to this section does not receive a majority vote in favor, this chapter is repealed six months following the certification of the second vote unless a later statute is enacted altering this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.   Note: Conditional repeal affects Chapter 2.5, comprising Sections 65001 to 65087.)
-------------------------------------------

65067.

(a) Before an implementation referendum vote conducted by the secretary pursuant to this article, a proponent of the establishment of the council shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary deems necessary to defray the expenses of analyzing the proposed council and certifying the necessary list of producers submitted by the Bureau of Livestock Identification and conducting the vote.

(b) Any funds not used in conducting an implementation referendum established by this article shall be returned to the proponents of the council who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) Upon establishment of the council, the council may reimburse the proponents of the
 council for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out this article, and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65068.

(a) Five years after implementation of this chapter, the secretary shall hold a public hearing after providing proper notice to producers subject to this chapter and any other persons or entities who have requested, in writing, notice of the hearing to determine whether the operation of this chapter should be continued. If, after the hearing, the secretary finds that a substantial question exists among the producers assessed under this chapter as to whether the operation of this chapter should be continued, the secretary shall conduct a reapproval referendum to be conducted among producers to determine whether the operation of this chapter shall be reapproved and continue in effect.

(b) If the secretary finds, after conducting a hearing, that no substantial question
 exists or if a reapproval referendum is required and a majority of eligible producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of continuing the operation of this chapter, the secretary shall certify the vote and this chapter shall remain operative. If the secretary finds that a majority vote has not been given, the secretary shall certify the vote and declare the operation of this chapter suspended and the operations of the council concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in subdivision (c). A bond or security shall not be required for the referendum. The secretary shall provide public notice of the suspension of this chapter on the department’s internet website.

(c) On the expiration of this chapter pursuant to this article, the council shall remain in existence for the purpose of furnishing the secretary with a complete record of its outstanding financial obligations, accrued and to accrue. The secretary shall pay from the money
 deposited and disbursed any outstanding obligations and any obligations incurred by the secretary and the department under the terms and provisions of this section. Any money that remains shall be retained by the secretary to defray the expenses of formulation, issuance, administration, or enforcement of any subsequent program for beef promotion. If such a program is not undertaken within a period of three years from the date of termination of this chapter, the money shall be used to fund activities related to the subject matter of this chapter at the discretion of the secretary.

(d) Following a hearing and favorable referendum, if required, the process specified in this section shall be conducted by the secretary every five years between July 1 and June 30 of the following year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 128.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65069.

(a) On the secretary’s own motion, at the request of the council, or at the request of a producer, the secretary may determine that it is no longer in the best interest of the state to continue the existence of the council and the programs established and maintained pursuant to this chapter.

(b) If the secretary makes the determination described in subdivision (a), the secretary shall call a vote of the producers to determine if the council should be terminated.

(c) (1) The secretary shall certify a vote conducted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) If a majority of producers vote in favor of
 terminating the council, the secretary shall declare the operation of this chapter suspended, the operations of the council concluded, and distribute the funds in the manner provided for in subdivision (c) of Section 65068. The secretary shall provide public notice of the suspension of this chapter on the department’s Internet Web site.

(3) If a majority of producers do not vote in favor of terminating the council, the operation of this chapter shall continue in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Financial Provisions [65071. - 65077.]

65071.

(a) In order to carry out the programs and administer the activities that are conducted pursuant to this chapter, an assessment of one dollar ($1) per head shall be paid on each sale of cattle and calves. The assessment shall be charged on all cattle and calves, except the following:

(1) Hides, skins, or the offal of animals.

(2) Any cattle or calves that are transported for purposes other than for sale or slaughter and without a change of ownership.

(3) Any cattle or calves custom slaughtered exclusively for the owner, members of the owner’s household, or the owner’s nonpaying guests or employees.

(4) Any cattle or calves weighing less than 200 pounds.

(5) Any cattle or calves originating outside the state transported solely to a stockyard or slaughter facility to be sold or slaughtered within 30 calendar days of arrival.

(6) Any cattle or calves sold within 10 days of being purchased where the seller can demonstrate the assessment has been paid within the past 10 days.

(b) The assessment charged pursuant to this chapter shall not
 be charged or collected more than once from each owner upon the same animal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 324, Sec. 10.   (AB 1801)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65072.

(a) Each person who is required to pay or collect the assessment shall maintain a complete and accurate record of all transactions subject to assessments under this chapter. These records shall contain information required by the secretary relating to the payment or collection of assessments, shall be preserved for a period of two years, and shall be offered and submitted for inspection and audit at any reasonable time upon written demand by the secretary or the secretary’s duly authorized agent.

(b) All information obtained by the secretary or the secretary’s duly authorized agent from any inspection or audit of records shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required in a judicial
 proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65073.

(a) The assessment for cattle or calves, whether originating in the state or out of state, shall be paid by the seller. The assessment shall be charged and collected from the seller or from the seller’s account and paid to the council by each operator of a stockyard, livestock auction market, or slaughter facility. The assessment is due and payable to the council on or before the 15th day of the month next succeeding the month in which the cattle and calves are sold. Assessments that are not collected in the manner provided in this subdivision shall be collected from the seller by the Bureau of Livestock Identification at the time that brand inspection fees are collected.

(b) The assessment for cattle or calves for which the assessment would
 not otherwise be collected pursuant to subdivision (a) and that are also exempt from a brand inspection shall be charged and collected from the seller and paid to the council in a manner determined by the department.

(c) Any assessment that is not collected in the manner specified in subdivision (a) or (b) shall be paid to the council directly by the seller on or before the 15th day of the month next succeeding the month in which the sale occurs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65074.

The assessments that are collected by the Bureau of Livestock Identification pursuant to this article shall be forwarded to the secretary at the same time and in the same manner as the inspection fees that are provided for in Article 9 (commencing with Section 21281) of Chapter 6 of Division 10. The secretary shall reimburse, from any money that is collected pursuant to this section, the Bureau of Livestock Identification and any other bureaus or agencies of the state for any additional expenses that are incurred by them in the administration or enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65075.

Any person who is subject to the assessment that is required by Section 65071 may obtain a refund of the assessment collected by submitting to the council a claim for a refund. The claim shall be submitted to the council by mail, facsimile, electronic mail, or a refund request form through the council’s Internet Web site within 90 days after the date of the brand inspection or the date of payment of the assessment, whichever date is later. The refund of an assessment shall be made by the council within 60 days of the date on which the refund request is received. The council or the department may not place conditions on the issuance of the refund except for requiring the claim for the refund to demonstrate the fee has been paid. The secretary, department, council, or producers, by referendum, shall not limit or inhibit a refund
 under this section for a person that has paid the assessment required by Section 65071.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65076.

(a) Proprietary information obtained pursuant to this article by the council or the secretary, including the names and addresses of producers and the amounts of individual refunds or the identity of a person that received a refund pursuant to Section 65075, is confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding.

(b) Data that is aggregated from proprietary information, including the total amount refunded by the council annually, is not confidential, and may be disclosed to the public, if the data does not disclose proprietary information of an individual producer and the data does not identify an individual producer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65077.

An assessment that is levied pursuant to this chapter is a personal debt of the assessed person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [65081. - 65087.]

65081.

Any person who fails to pay, collect, or remit any fees due within the time specified in this chapter shall be liable for administrative costs incurred by the department in enforcing this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65082.

The secretary may pursue an action to hold a person civilly liable in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each head of cattle or calves that is sold by any person who fails to pay, collect, or remit any fees due within the time specified in this chapter. The person also shall be liable for the total amount of fees due and the costs of a civil suit, including attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65083.

The secretary may request that the Attorney General file an action in an appropriate court to collect any unpaid fees, civil penalties, or other costs incurred by the department in pursuit of a violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65084.

The secretary may request that the Attorney General petition an appropriate court for the issuance of an injunction, restraining any person in violation of any requirement specified in this chapter, or regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, from continuing the violation. The court also may require the performance of any obligation imposed under this chapter or any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65085.

Any action by the secretary for any penalty or other remedy that is prescribed under this chapter shall be commenced within three years from the date of discovery of the alleged violation. Any action against the council by any person shall be commenced within three years from the date of the alleged violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65086.

(a) Any person subject to this chapter may contest a determination of delinquent assessments, or other violation of this chapter, and request an informal hearing as outlined in this section.

(b) A request for an informal hearing shall be submitted in writing to the department.

(c) A request for an informal hearing shall be submitted within 30 days from the receipt of the department’s adverse determination. The failure to present a timely request for an informal hearing constitutes a waiver of the respondent’s right to contest the adverse determination. The department shall deny an untimely request for a hearing.

(d) Upon receipt of a timely request for an informal hearing, the department shall provide a notice of the hearing to the respondent that contains all of the following information:

(1) Date, location, and time of the hearing.

(2) The department’s contact information, including, but not limited to, applicable telephone and facsimile numbers.

(3) Subject matter of the adverse determination.

(4) Any other information or documentation relative to the adverse determination.

(e) The department shall designate a hearing officer to preside over and conduct the informal hearing. A hearing officer may conduct a hearing by telephone, at the hearing officer’s discretion.

(f) (1) The standard of proof to be applied by the hearing officer shall be a preponderance of the evidence, unless statutes or regulations applicable to the determination provide a higher standard.

(2) The hearing officer shall issue a written decision with a brief statement of the conclusion and findings to support the conclusion within 14 days after the conclusion of the hearing. The hearing officer may issue the decision orally at the conclusion of the hearing, subject to written confirmation.

(3) The written decision of the hearing officer shall be served on the respondent either by overnight mail or by facsimile transmission.

(g) The written decision of the hearing officer shall be effective immediately upon receipt and shall be
 final.

(h) The respondent may appeal the hearing officer’s decision in accordance with Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------

65087.

The termination of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability that has arisen or that may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the secretary with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 2.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Provisions operative or inoperative as prescribed in Sections 65061, 65066, 65068, and 65069.    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 65066.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The California Table Grape Commission [65500. - 65675.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declarations and Purposes [65500. - 65502.]

65500.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Grapes produced in California for fresh human consumption compose one of the major agricultural crops of California, and the production and marketing of these grapes affects the economy, welfare, standard of living, and health of a large number of citizens residing in this state.

(b) Increased plantings of vineyards and improved cultural practices for the production of California grapes for fresh human consumption have increased and will continue to increase the production of California grapes, and unless the fresh human consumption of California grapes is increased by the expansion of existing markets and the development of new markets, the interests of the fresh
 grape industry of California, and the public interest of the people of this state, will be adversely affected. The expansion of the table grape industry also provides an important source of jobs for many people in this state, a high proportion of whom reside in historically depressed areas of the state, and serves to ensure the preservation of an agrarian society.

(c) The inability of individual producers to maintain or expand present markets or to develop new or larger markets for these grapes results in an unreasonable and unnecessary economic waste of the agricultural wealth of this state.

(d) These conditions and the accompanying waste jeopardize the future continued production of adequate supplies of fresh grapes for human consumption for the people of this and other states, and prevent producers from obtaining a fair return for their labor, their farms, and their
 production. As a consequence, the purchasing power of these producers and their workforce has been in the past, and may continue to be in the future unless these conditions are remedied, low in relation to that of other people engaged in other gainful occupations within the state, and they are thereby prevented from maintaining a proper standard of living and from contributing their fair share to the support of the necessary governmental and education functions, thus tending to increase unfairly the tax burden of other citizens of the state.

(e) These conditions vitally concern the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state. It is therefore necessary and expedient in the public interest to protect and enhance the reputation of California fresh grapes for human consumption in intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets, and to otherwise act so to eliminate unreasonable and unnecessary economic waste of the
 agricultural wealth of this state.

(f) The promotion of the sale of fresh grapes for human consumption by means of advertising, dissemination of information on the manner and means of production, and the care and effort required in the production of these grapes, the methods and care required in preparing and transporting these grapes to market, and the handling of the same in consuming markets, research respecting the health, food, and dietetic value of California fresh grapes and the production, handling, transportation, and marketing of California fresh grapes, the dissemination of information respecting the results of that research, instruction of the wholesale and retail trade with respect to handling thereof, and the education and instruction of the general public with reference to the various varieties of California fresh grapes for human consumption, the time to use and consume each variety and the uses to which each variety should be
 put, the dietetic and health value of fresh grapes, all serve to increase the consumption of fresh grapes and to expand existing markets and create new markets for fresh grapes, and prevent agricultural waste, and is therefore in the interests of the welfare, public economy, and health of the people of this state.

(g) It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to aid producers of California fresh grapes in preventing economic waste in the production and marketing of their commodity, to develop more efficient and equitable methods in that production and marketing, and to aid these producers in restoring and maintaining their purchasing power at a more adequate, equitable, and reasonable level.

(h) The production and marketing of grapes produced in California for fresh human consumption is declared to be affected with a public interest; this chapter is enacted in the
 exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 1.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65501.

Notwithstanding other laws to the contrary, in the event a commodity or marketing agreement or marketing order under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Agriculture or other appropriate federal agency, is created by referendum or under the applicable laws and procedures relating thereto, in this state or in any geographical area within this state, which agreement or order contains provisions substantially similar to the provisions of this chapter, this chapter shall be inapplicable to any producer, shipper, or other person covered by, and, to the extent of such coverage, during the existence of such federal agreement or order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65502.

This chapter shall be known as the Ketchum Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions and General Provisions [65520. - 65533.]

65520.

As used in this chapter, the words in the following sections have the following meanings set forth hereafter unless otherwise apparent from the context.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 125.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

65521.

“Cartwright Act” means the act set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700), Part 2, Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65522.

“Unfair Practices Act” means the act set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000), Part 2, Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65523.

“Fresh grapes” also designated “table grapes” means any and all varieties of grapes produced in the State of California shipped for fresh human consumption, but does not include grapes delivered to a processor for processing or grapes processed by a processor or grapes delivered to a winery for winemaking or grapes produced for use in the making of wine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65524.

“Producer” means a person engaged within this state in the business of producing or causing to be produced for market “fresh grapes.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 2.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65525.

“Shipper” means any person engaged within this state in shipping fresh grapes, whether as owner, agent, or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65526.

“Processor” and derivatives therefrom, means every person and every plant within this state to whom or to which grapes are delivered for the purpose of drying, dehydrating, canning, pressing, crushing, extracting, cooking, quick freezing, or for use in producing or manufacturing a product or manufactured article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65527.

“Person” means an individual, firm, corporation, association, or any other business entity, and includes a state agency that engages in any of the commercial activities regulated pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 3.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65528.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 4.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65529.

“Advertising and sales promotion” means, in addition to the ordinarily accepted meaning thereof, trade promotion and activities for the prevention, modification or removal of trade barriers which restrict the free flow of fresh grapes to market and may include the presentation of facts to, and negotiations with, state, federal or foreign governmental agencies on matters which affect the marketing of such grapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65530.

“State” means the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 5.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65531.

“Commission” means the California Table Grape Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1467.)
-------------------------------------------

65532.

“Commissioner” means a person appointed by the secretary pursuant to Section 65550.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 614, Sec. 6.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

65533.

“Districts” means and includes:

(a) District 1, which includes all that area of California south of a line described as beginning at the point of intersection of the shoreline of the Pacific Ocean with the northern boundary line of the County of San Diego; thence northeasterly along the northern boundary of the County of San Diego to the point of intersection with the western boundary of the County of Riverside; thence northerly along the western boundary of the County of Riverside to the northern boundary of the County of Riverside; thence easterly along the northern boundary of the County of Riverside to the point of intersection with the California-Arizona state boundary. 

(b) District 2, which includes all that